Nevada, session 83, AB420.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 391 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. On or before the first day of each school year, the board of
trustees of a school district that employs school police officers and
the governing body of a charter school that has entered into a
contract pursuant to NRS 388A.384 for the provision of school
police officers must prepare and publish on the Internet website of
the school district or charter school, as applicable, a report
relating to the use of force by school police officers during the
immediately preceding school year.
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must set
forth:
(a) The number of incidents involving the use of force
involving the use of:
(1) A baton;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(2) A chemical agent; or
(3) An electronic stun device.
(b) For each incident described in paragraph (a):
(1) The location of the incident, including, without
limitation, whether the incident occurred:
(I) On or in the grounds, property, buildings or any
other facility of the school district or charter school; or
(II) A location other than the grounds, property,
buildings or any other facility of the school district or charter
school;
(2) Whether the incident occurred during the school day or
at an activity or event sponsored by the school district or charter
school; and
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, the
rank of each school police officer who used such force and the
number of years that each such school police officer has been
employed. The provisions of this subparagraph only apply to the
report required of the board of trustees of a school district that
employs more than 75 school police officers.
(c) The demographic information, including, without
limitation, age, race, gender and ethnicity, of the persons upon
whom such force was used by school police. All information must
be reported in the aggregate and must not include any personally
identifiable information.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Baton” means a cylindrical instrument that is designed to
deliver a blunt force contact or a strike to a person in close
proximity.
(b) “Chemical agent” means any chemical which can rapidly
produce sensory irritation or disabling physical effects in humans,
which disappear within a short time following termination of
exposure. The term includes, without limitation, items commonly
referred to as tear gas, pepper spray, pepper balls and oleoresin
capsicum.
(c) “Electronic stun device” means a device that:
(1) Emits an electrical charge or current that is transmitted
by projectile, physical contact or other means; and
(2) Is designed to disable a person or animal temporarily or
permanently.
(d) “School police officer” means a peace officer who:
(1) Is employed by the board of trustees of a school district;
or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(2) Provides services to a charter school pursuant to a
contract entered into with the board of trustees of a school district
pursuant to NRS 388A.384.
Secs. 2-5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5.5. The first report required pursuant to section 1 of this
act:
1. Is due on or before the first day of the 2026-2027 school
year; and
2. Must contain the information required pursuant to section 1
of this act for the 2025-2026 school year.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)